Missouri, session 2026, HB1982.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 9.502, to read as follows:
9.502. March twenty-sixth of each year is hereby designated as "Pediatric Acute-
2 Onset Neuropsychiatric Syndrome (PANS)/Pediatric Autoimmune Neuropsychiatric
3 Disorder Associated with Streptococcus (PANDAS) Awareness Day". The citizens of
4 this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate events and activities to raise
5 PANS/PANDAS awareness.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.